Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4540.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.07, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Edible cannabinoid product handler endorsement. (a) deleted text begin Any persondeleted text end new text begin A license holdernew text end seeking to manufacture, process, sell, handle, or store an edible cannabis product or lower-potency hemp edible, other than an edible cannabis product or lower-potency hemp edible that has been placed in its final packaging, must deleted text begin firstdeleted text end new text begin apply for and new text end obtain an edible cannabinoid product handler endorsement. (b) In consultation with the commissioner of agriculture, the office shall establish an edible cannabinoid product handler endorsement. (c) The office must regulate edible cannabinoid product handlers in a manner consistent with Department of Agriculture regulation of food handlers under chapters 28A, 31, and 34A and associated rules, with the following exceptions: (1) the office must issue an edible cannabinoid product handler endorsement, rather than a license; (2) eligibility for an edible cannabinoid product handler endorsement is limited to persons who possess a valid license issued by the office; (3) the office may not charge a fee for issuing or renewing the endorsement; (4) the office must align the term and renewal period for edible cannabinoid product handler endorsements with the term and renewal period of the license issued by the office; and (5) an edible cannabis product or new text begin a new text end lower-potency hemp edible must not be considered adulterated solely because the product or edible contains tetrahydrocannabinol, cannabis concentrate, hemp concentrate, artificially derived cannabinoids, or any other material extracted or derived from a cannabis plant, cannabis flower, hemp plant, or hemp plant parts. (d) deleted text begin Thedeleted text end new text begin Annew text end edible cannabinoid product handler endorsement deleted text begin must prohibitdeleted text end new text begin prohibitsnew text end the manufacture of edible cannabis products at the same premises where food is manufactured, except for the limited production of edible products produced solely for product development, sampling, or testing. deleted text begin Thisdeleted text end new text begin The new text end limitation new text begin in this paragraph new text end does not apply to the manufacture of lower-potency hemp edibles. new text begin (e) An edible cannabinoid product handler endorsement is available to the following license holders: new text end new text begin (1) cannabis microbusinesses; new text end new text begin (2) cannabis mezzobusinesses; new text end new text begin (3) cannabis manufacturers; new text end new text begin (4) lower-potency hemp edible manufacturers; and new text end new text begin (5) medical cannabis combination businesses. new text end new text begin (f) A lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer with an edible cannabinoid product handler endorsement may only manufacture lower-potency hemp edibles and must not add any cannabis flower, cannabis concentrate, or cannabinoid derived from cannabis flower or cannabis concentrate to a product consistent with the requirements in section 342.45. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.09, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Violations; penalties. (a) In addition to penalties listed in this subdivision, a person who violates the provisions of this chapter is subject to any applicable criminal penalty. (b) The office may assess the following civil penalties on a person who sellsnew text begin or intends to sellnew text end cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products without a license issued under this chapter that authorizes the sale: (1) if the person sellsnew text begin or intends to sellnew text end up to two ounces of cannabis flower, up to $3,000 or three times the retail market value of the cannabis flower, whichever is greater; (2) if the person sellsnew text begin or intends to sellnew text end more than two ounces but not more than eight ounces of cannabis flower, up to $10,000 or three times the retail market value of the cannabis flower, whichever is greater; (3) if the person sellsnew text begin or intends to sellnew text end more than eight ounces but not more than one pound of cannabis flower, up to $25,000 or three times the retail market value of the cannabis flower, whichever is greater; (4) if the person sellsnew text begin or intends to sellnew text end more than one pound but not more than five pounds of cannabis flower, up to $50,000 or three times the retail market value of the cannabis flower, whichever is greater; (5) if the person sellsnew text begin or intends to sellnew text end more than five pounds but not more than 25 pounds of cannabis flower, up to $100,000 or three times the retail market value of the cannabis flower, whichever is greater; (6) if the person sellsnew text begin or intends to sellnew text end more than 25 pounds but not more than 50 pounds of cannabis flower, up to $250,000 or three times the retail market value of the cannabis flower, whichever is greater; and (7) if the person sellsnew text begin or intends to sellnew text end more than 50 pounds of cannabis flower, up to $1,000,000 or three times the retail market value of the cannabis flower, whichever is greater. new text begin (c) If a person possesses twice or more of the amount of cannabis flower or cannabinoid products allowed in subdivision 1, paragraph (a), the office must consider the possession as evidence of the person's intent to sell and may assess a civil penalty. new text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end The office may assess the following civil penalties on a person who sells cannabis concentrate without a license issued under this chapter that authorizes the sale: (1) if the person sells up to eight grams of cannabis concentrate, up to $3,000 or three times the retail market value of the cannabis concentrate, whichever is greater; (2) if the person sells more than eight grams but not more than 40 grams of cannabis concentrate, up to $10,000 or three times the retail market value of the cannabis concentrate, whichever is greater; (3) if the person sells more than 40 grams but not more than 80 grams of cannabis concentrate, up to $25,000 or three times the retail market value of the cannabis concentrate, whichever is greater; (4) if the person sells more than 80 grams but not more than 400 grams of cannabis concentrate, up to $50,000 or three times the retail market value of the cannabis concentrate, whichever is greater; (5) if the person sells more than 400 grams but not more than two kilograms of cannabis concentrate, up to $100,000 or three times the retail market value of the cannabis concentrate, whichever is greater; (6) if the person sells more than two kilograms but not more than four kilograms of cannabis concentrate, up to $250,000 or three times the retail market value of the cannabis concentrate, whichever is greater; and (7) if the person sells more than four kilograms of cannabis concentrate, up to $1,000,000 or three times the retail market value of the cannabis concentrate, whichever is greater. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end The office may assess the following civil penalties on a person who imports or sells products infused with tetrahydrocannabinol without a license issued under this chapter that authorizes the importation or sale: (1) if the person imports or sells products infused with up to 800 milligrams of tetrahydrocannabinol, up to $3,000 or three times the retail market value of the infused product, whichever is greater; (2) if the person imports or sells products infused with a total of more than 800 milligrams but not more than four grams of tetrahydrocannabinol, up to $10,000 or three times the retail market value of the infused product, whichever is greater; (3) if the person imports or sells products infused with a total of more than four grams but not more than eight grams of tetrahydrocannabinol, up to $25,000 or three times the retail market value of the infused product, whichever is greater; (4) if the person imports or sells products infused with a total of more than eight grams but not more than 40 grams of tetrahydrocannabinol, up to $50,000 or three times the retail market value of the infused product, whichever is greater; (5) if the person imports or sells products infused with a total of more than 40 grams but not more than 200 grams of tetrahydrocannabinol, up to $100,000 or three times the retail market value of the infused product, whichever is greater; (6) if the person imports or sells products infused with a total of more than 200 grams but not more than 400 grams of tetrahydrocannabinol, up to $250,000 or three times the retail market value of the infused product, whichever is greater; and (7) if the person imports or sells products infused with a total of more than 400 grams of tetrahydrocannabinol, up to $1,000,000 or three times the retail market value of the infused product, whichever is greater. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end The office may assess a civil penalty of up to $500 for each plant grown in excess of the limit on a person who grows more than eight cannabis plants or more than four mature, flowering plants, without a license to cultivate cannabis issued under this chapter. Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.12, is amended to read: 342.12 LICENSES; TRANSFERS; ADJUSTMENTS. (a) Licenses issued under this chapter that are available to all applicants pursuant to section 342.14, subdivision 1b, paragraph (c), may be freely transferred subject to the prior written approval of the office unless the license holder has not received a final site inspection or the license holder is a social equity applicant. (b) Licenses issued as social equity licenses pursuant to either section 342.14, subdivision 1b, paragraph (b), or section 342.175, paragraph (b), may only be transferred to another social equity applicant for three years after the date on which the office issues the license. Three years after the date of issuance, a license holder may transfer a license to any entity. Transfer of a license that was issued as a social equity license must be reviewed by the Division of Social Equity and is subject to the prior written approval of the office. (c) Preliminary license approval issued pursuant to section 342.14, subdivision 5, may not be transferred. (d) A new license must be obtained whendeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1) the form of the licensee's legal business structure converts or changes to a different type of legal business structure; or deleted text end deleted text begin (2)deleted text end the deleted text begin licenseedeleted text end new text begin license holdernew text end dissolves; consolidates; reorganizes; undergoes bankruptcy, insolvency, or receivership proceedings; merges with another legal organization; or assigns all or substantially all of its assets for the benefit of creditors. (e) Licenses must be renewed annually. (f) License holders may petition the office to adjust the tier of a license issued within a license category if the license holder meets all applicable requirements. (g) The office by rule may permit the relocation of a licensed cannabis business; permit the relocation of an approved operational location, including a cultivation, manufacturing, processing, or retail location; adopt requirements for the submission of a license relocation application; establish standards for the approval of a relocation application; and charge a fee not to exceed $250 for reviewing and processing applications. Relocation of a licensed premises pursuant to this paragraph does not extend or otherwise modify the license term of the license subject to relocation. Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.15, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Criminal offenses; disqualifications. deleted text begin (a)deleted text end The office may by rule determine whether any felony convictions, including but not limited to convictions for noncannabis controlled substance crimes in the first or second degree, human trafficking, labor trafficking, fraud, or financial crimes, disqualify an individual from holding or receiving a cannabis business license issued under this chapter or working for a cannabis business, and the length of any such disqualification. In adopting rules pursuant to this subdivision, the office shall not disqualify an individual for a violation of section 152.025. deleted text begin (b) The office must not issue a cannabis business license to any person or business who was convicted of illegally selling cannabis after August 1, 2023, unless five years have passed since the date of conviction. deleted text end deleted text begin (c) The office must not issue a cannabis business license to any person or business who violated this chapter after August 1, 2023, unless five years have passed since the date of violation. The office may set aside the violation if the office finds that the violation occurred as a result of a mistake made in good faith and the violation did not involve gross negligence, an illegal sale of cannabis, or cause harm to the public. The office must not issue a license to any person or business who the office has assessed a fine to under section 342.09, subdivision 6. deleted text end Sec. 5. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.15, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Civil and regulatory offenses; disqualifications. new text begin (a) new text end The office may determine whether any civil or regulatory violations, as determined by another state agency, local unit of government, or any other jurisdiction, disqualify an individual from holding or receiving a cannabis business license issued under this chapter or disqualify an individual from working for a cannabis business, and the length of the disqualification. Upon the office's request, a state agency, as defined in section 13.02, subdivision 17, except for the Department of Revenue, may release civil investigative data, including data classified as protected nonpublic or confidential under section 13.39, subdivision 2, if the request is related to a specific applicant and the data is necessary to make a determination under this section. new text begin (b) The office must not issue a cannabis business license to any person or business who violated this chapter after August 1, 2023, unless five years have passed since the date of the violation. The office may set aside the violation if the office finds that the violation: new text end new text begin (1) occurred as a result of a mistake made in good faith; new text end new text begin (2) did not involve gross negligence; new text end new text begin (3) did not involve an illegal sale of cannabis; and new text end new text begin (4) did not cause harm to the public. new text end new text begin (c) The office must not issue a cannabis business license to any person or business who was assessed a fine by the office under section 342.09, subdivision 6. new text end new text begin (d) The office may determine the length of a disqualification for a true party of interest who owns or controls more than ten percent of a cannabis business that had a cannabis business license or hemp business license revoked by the office under section 342.21. new text end Sec. 6. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.19, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Violations; administrative orders and penalties. (a) The office may issue an administrative order to any licensed cannabis business or hemp business that the office determines has committed a violation of this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter. The administrative order may require the business to correct the violation or to cease and desist from committing the violation. The order must state the deficiencies that constitute the violation and the time by which the violation must be corrected. If the business believes that the information in the administrative order is in error, the business may ask the office to consider the parts of the order that are alleged to be in error. The request must be in writing, delivered to the office by certified mail within seven days after receipt of the order, and provide documentation to support the allegation of error. The office must respond to a request for reconsideration within 15 days after receiving the request. A request for reconsideration does not stay the correction order unless the office issues a supplemental order granting additional time. The office's disposition of a request for reconsideration is final. (b) For each violation of this chapter or rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, the office may issue to each cannabis business or hemp business a monetary penalty of up to $10,000, an amount that deprives the business of any economic advantage gained by the violation, or both. (c) An administrative penalty may be recovered in a civil action in the name of the state brought in the district court of the county where the violation is alleged to have occurred or the district court where the office is housed. (d) In addition to penalties listed in this subdivision, a person or business who violates the provisions of this chapter is subject to any applicable criminal penalty. new text begin (e) If any product regulated under this chapter is present on the premises of a business conducting retail sales, the office must consider the presence of the product as evidence of the business's intent to offer the product for sale. new text end Sec. 7. new text begin [342.245] ENDORSEMENTS. new text end new text begin (a) The office must provide endorsement application forms to applicants. new text end new text begin (b) The office may deny an endorsement application if: new text end new text begin (1) the license holder has previously had an endorsement suspended, revoked, or canceled by the office within the last five years; new text end new text begin (2) the license holder owes outstanding fines to the office for violations; or new text end new text begin (3) the license holder does not meet the requirements to: (i) conduct activities authorized by the endorsement; or (ii) conduct activities authorized by the endorsement at the specific location indicated on the application. new text end new text begin (c) The office must not charge a fee to an applicant for an endorsement application. new text end new text begin (d) The office must align the term and renewal period for an endorsement with the term and renewal period of the applicant's license. new text end Sec. 8. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.25, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Applicability. deleted text begin Everydeleted text end new text begin (a) Anew text end cannabis business deleted text begin with a license or endorsement authorizing the cultivation of cannabisdeleted text end new text begin seeking to cultivate cannabis new text end must deleted text begin comply with the requirements of this sectiondeleted text end new text begin apply for and obtain a cannabis cultivation endorsementnew text end . new text begin (b) A cannabis cultivation endorsement is available to the following license holders: new text end new text begin (1) cannabis microbusinesses; new text end new text begin (2) cannabis mezzobusinesses; new text end new text begin (3) cannabis cultivators; and new text end new text begin (4) medical cannabis combination businesses. new text end Sec. 9. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.25, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Cultivation records. A business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to cultivate cannabisdeleted text end new text begin with a cannabis cultivation endorsementnew text end must prepare a cultivation record for each batch of cannabis plants and cannabis flower in the form required by the office and must maintain each record for at least five years. deleted text begin Thedeleted text end new text begin Anew text end cultivation record must include the quantity and timing, deleted text begin wheredeleted text end new text begin ifnew text end applicable, of each pesticide, fertilizer, soil amendment, or plant amendment used to cultivate the batch, as well as any other information required by the office in rule. deleted text begin Thedeleted text end new text begin Anew text end cannabis business must deleted text begin presentdeleted text end new text begin providenew text end cultivation records to the office, the commissioner of agriculture, or the commissioner of health upon request. Sec. 10. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.25, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Agricultural chemicals and other inputs. A business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to cultivate cannabisdeleted text end new text begin with a cannabis cultivation endorsementnew text end is subject to rules promulgated by the office in consultation with the commissioner of agriculture, subject to subdivision 5, governing the use of pesticides, fertilizers, soil amendments, plant amendments, and other inputs to cultivate cannabis. Sec. 11. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.25, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Cultivation plan. A business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to cultivate cannabisdeleted text end new text begin with a cannabis cultivation endorsementnew text end must prepare, maintain, and execute an operating plan and a cultivation plan as directed by the office in rule, which must include but is not limited to: (1) water usage; (2) recycling; (3) solid waste disposal; and (4) a pest management protocol that incorporates integrated pest management principles to control or prevent the introduction of pests to the cultivation site. Sec. 12. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.25, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Agricultural chemicals and other inputs; pollinator protection. (a) A business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to cultivate cannabisdeleted text end new text begin with a cannabis cultivation endorsementnew text end must comply with chapters 18B, 18C, 18D, and any other pesticide, fertilizer, soil amendment, and plant amendment laws and rules enforced by the commissioner of agriculture. (b) A business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to cultivate cannabisdeleted text end new text begin with a cannabis cultivation endorsementnew text end must not apply pesticides when pollinators are present or allow pesticides to drift to flowering plants that are attractive to pollinators. Sec. 13. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.25, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Adulteration prohibited. A business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to cultivate cannabisdeleted text end new text begin with a cannabis cultivation endorsementnew text end must not treat or otherwise adulterate cannabis plants or cannabis flower with any substance or compound that has the effect or intent of altering the color, appearance, weight, potency, or odor of the cannabis. Sec. 14. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.25, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Indoor or outdoor cultivation authorized; security. A business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to cultivate cannabisdeleted text end new text begin with a cannabis cultivation endorsementnew text end may cultivate cannabis plants indoors or outdoors, subject to the security, fencing, lighting, and any other requirements imposed by the office in rule. Sec. 15. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.26, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Applicability. deleted text begin Everydeleted text end new text begin (a) Anew text end cannabis business deleted text begin with a license or endorsement authorizing the creation of cannabis concentrate and manufacture of cannabis products and hemp-derived consumer products for public consumption must comply with the requirements of this sectiondeleted text end new text begin seeking to manufacture cannabis products must apply for and obtain the applicable endorsement according to subdivisions 3 and 4new text end . new text begin (b) An endorsement under subdivisions 3 and 4 is available to the following license holders: new text end new text begin (1) cannabis microbusinesses; new text end new text begin (2) cannabis mezzobusinesses; new text end new text begin (3) cannabis manufacturers; and new text end new text begin (4) medical cannabis combination businesses. new text end Sec. 16. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.26, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. All manufacturer operations. (a) Cannabis manufacturing must take place in an enclosed, locked facility that is used exclusively for the manufacture of cannabis products, creation of hemp concentrate, creation of artificially derived cannabinoids, creation of lower-potency hemp edibles, or creation of hemp-derived consumer products, except that a business that also holds a cannabis cultivator license may operate in a facility that shares general office space, bathrooms, entryways, and walkways. (b) Cannabis manufacturing must take place on equipment that is used exclusively for the manufacture of cannabis products, creation of hemp concentrate, creation of artificially derived cannabinoids, creation of lower-potency hemp edibles, or creation of hemp-derived consumer products. (c) A business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to manufacture cannabis productsdeleted text end new text begin with an endorsement under subdivision 3 or 4new text end must comply with all applicable packaging, labeling, and health and safety requirements. new text begin (d) A cannabis business with a production of consumer product endorsement may not manufacture, import, export, or sell a cannabinoid product that uses an electronic delivery device with an embedded or inseparable battery. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Paragraph (d) is effective January 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 17. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.26, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. new text begin Cannabis new text end extraction and concentrationnew text begin endorsement, hemp extraction and concentration endorsement, and creation of artificially derived cannabinoids endorsementnew text end . (a) A new text begin cannabis new text end business deleted text begin licensed or authorizeddeleted text end new text begin seekingnew text end to manufacture deleted text begin cannabis products that createsdeleted text end cannabis concentratedeleted text begin , hemp concentrate, or artificially derived cannabinoidsdeleted text end must new text begin apply for and new text end obtain deleted text begin andeleted text end new text begin a cannabis extraction and concentration new text end endorsement deleted text begin from the officedeleted text end . new text begin (b) A cannabis business seeking to manufacture hemp concentrate must apply for and obtain a hemp extraction and concentration endorsement. new text end new text begin (c) A cannabis business seeking to manufacture artificially derived cannabinoids must apply for and obtain a creation of artificially derived cannabinoids endorsement. A cannabis business must hold a hemp extraction and concentration endorsement to apply for and obtain a creation of artificially derived cannabinoids endorsement. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (d) new text end A business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to manufacture cannabis productsdeleted text end new text begin with a cannabis extraction and concentration endorsement, hemp extraction and concentration endorsement, or creation of artificially derived cannabinoids endorsementnew text end must inform the office of all methods of extraction and concentration that the manufacturer intends to use and identify the volatile chemicals, if any, that will be involved in the creation of cannabis concentrate or hemp concentrate. A cannabis deleted text begin manufacturerdeleted text end new text begin business with a cannabis extraction and concentration endorsement, hemp extraction and concentration endorsement, or creation of artificially derived cannabinoids endorsementnew text end may not use a method of extraction and concentration or a volatile chemical without approval by the office. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (e) new text end A business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to manufacture cannabis productsdeleted text end new text begin with a cannabis extraction and concentration endorsement, hemp extraction and concentration endorsement, or creation of artificially derived cannabinoids endorsementnew text end must inform the office of all methods of conversion that the manufacturer will use, including any specific catalysts that the manufacturer will employ, to create artificially derived cannabinoids and the molecular nomenclature of all cannabinoids or other chemical compounds that the manufacturer will create. A business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to manufacture cannabis productsdeleted text end new text begin with a cannabis extraction and concentration endorsement, hemp extraction and concentration endorsement, or creation of artificially derived cannabinoids endorsementnew text end may not use a method of conversion or a catalyst without approval by the office. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (f) new text end A business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to manufacture cannabis productsdeleted text end new text begin with a cannabis extraction and concentration endorsement, hemp extraction and concentration endorsement, or creation of artificially derived cannabinoids endorsementnew text end must obtain a certification from an independent third-party industrial hygienist or professional engineer approving: (1) all electrical, gas, fire suppression, and exhaust systems; and (2) the plan for safe storage and disposal of hazardous substances, including but not limited to any volatile chemicals. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (g) new text end A business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to manufacture cannabis products that manufacturesdeleted text end new text begin with a cannabis extraction and concentration endorsement may manufacturenew text end cannabis concentrate from cannabis flower received from an unlicensed person who is at least 21 years of age new text begin and new text end must comply with all health and safety requirements established by the office. At a minimum, the office shall require the manufacturer to: (1) store the cannabis flower in an area that is segregated from cannabis flower and hemp plant parts received from a licensed cannabis business; (2) perform the extraction and concentration on equipment that is used exclusively for extraction or concentration of cannabis flower received from unlicensed individuals; (3) store any cannabis concentrate in an area that is segregated from cannabis concentrate, hemp concentrate, or artificially derived cannabinoids derived or manufactured from cannabis flower or hemp plant parts received from a licensed cannabis business; and (4) provide any cannabis concentrate only to the person who provided the cannabis flower. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (h) new text end Upon the sale of cannabis concentrate, hemp concentrate, or artificially derived cannabinoids to any person, cooperative, or business, a business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to manufacture cannabis productsdeleted text end new text begin with a cannabis extraction and concentration endorsement, hemp extraction and concentration endorsement, or creation of artificially derived cannabinoids endorsementnew text end must provide a statement to the buyer that discloses the method of extraction and concentration or conversion used and any solvents, gases, or catalysts, including but not limited to any volatile chemicals, involved in that method. Sec. 18. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.26, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. new text begin Edible cannabinoid product handler endorsement and new text end production of consumer productsnew text begin endorsementnew text end . (a) A new text begin cannabis new text end business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to manufacture cannabis products that produces edible cannabis products or lower-potency hemp ediblesdeleted text end new text begin seeking to produce edible cannabis products or lower-potency hemp edibles new text end must new text begin apply for and new text end obtain an edible cannabinoid product handler endorsement from the office. new text begin (b) A cannabis business with an edible cannabinoid product handler endorsement must comply with the requirements in section 342.07, subdivision 3. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end A new text begin cannabis new text end business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to manufacture cannabis productsdeleted text end new text begin seeking to produce hemp-derived consumer products or cannabis products other than edible cannabis products new text end must new text begin apply for and new text end obtain deleted text begin andeleted text end new text begin a production of consumer products new text end endorsement deleted text begin from the office to produce:deleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (1) cannabis products other than edible cannabis products; or deleted text end deleted text begin (2) hemp-derived consumer products other than lower-potency hemp edibles. deleted text end deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d) A cannabis business with an endorsement under this subdivision must ensure thatnew text end all areas within the licensed premises of deleted text begin adeleted text end new text begin thenew text end business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to manufacture cannabis products producing cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products mustdeleted text end meet the sanitary standards specified in rules adopted by the office. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end A new text begin cannabis new text end business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to manufacture cannabis productsdeleted text end new text begin with an endorsement under this subdivisionnew text end may only add chemicals or compounds approved by the office to cannabis concentrate, hemp concentrate, or artificially derived cannabinoids. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end Upon the sale of any cannabis product, lower-potency hemp edible, or hemp-derived consumer product to a cannabis business or hemp business, a new text begin cannabis new text end business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to manufacture cannabis productsdeleted text end new text begin with an endorsement under this subdivisionnew text end must provide a statement to the buyer that discloses the product's ingredients, including but not limited to any chemicals or compounds and any major food allergens declared by name. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end A business deleted text begin licensed or authorized to manufacture cannabis products shalldeleted text end new text begin with an endorsement under this subdivision mustnew text end not add any cannabis flower, cannabis concentrate, artificially derived cannabinoid, hemp plant part, or hemp concentrate to a product deleted text begin wheredeleted text end new text begin ifnew text end the manufacturer of the product holds a trademark to the product's name, except that a business licensed or authorized to manufacture cannabis products may use a trademarked food product if the manufacturer uses the product as a component or as part of a recipe and deleted text begin wheredeleted text end new text begin ifnew text end the business licensed or authorized to manufacture cannabis products does not state or advertise to the customer that the final retail cannabis product, lower-potency hemp edible, or hemp-derived consumer product contains a trademarked food product. Sec. 19. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.26, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Exception. Nothing in this section applies to the operations of a lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer.new text begin A lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer must comply with section 342.45 and applicable rules.new text end Sec. 20. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.27, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Applicability. deleted text begin Everydeleted text end new text begin (a) Anew text end cannabis business deleted text begin with a license or endorsement authorizing thedeleted text end new text begin seeking to conductnew text end retail deleted text begin saledeleted text end new text begin salesnew text end of cannabis flower deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin ,new text end cannabis productsnew text begin , hemp-derived consumer products, or lower-potency hemp edible productsnew text end must deleted text begin comply with the requirements of this sectiondeleted text end new text begin apply for and obtain a cannabis retail operations endorsementnew text end . new text begin (b) A cannabis retail operations endorsement is available to the following license holders: new text end new text begin (1) cannabis microbusinesses; new text end new text begin (2) cannabis mezzobusinesses; new text end new text begin (3) cannabis retailers; and new text end new text begin (4) medical cannabis combination businesses. new text end Sec. 21. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.27, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 2a. new text end new text begin Cannabis flower packaging endorsement. new text end new text begin (a) A cannabis business seeking to package cannabis flower at a point of retail sale must apply for and obtain a cannabis flower packaging endorsement. new text end new text begin (b) A cannabis business with a cannabis flower packaging endorsement must package cannabis flower in a container that: new text end new text begin (1) complies with all packaging requirements in section 342.62; new text end new text begin (2) complies with all applicable rules; and new text end new text begin (3) includes an affixed label on the container that, at the final point of sale to a customer, meets all requirements in section 342.63 and applicable rules. new text end new text begin (c) A cannabis business with a cannabis flower packaging endorsement may store bulk cannabis flower intended to be packaged at the point of sale outside of the secure storage area during operating hours. At the end of operating hours, the business must ensure that bulk cannabis flower is placed in the secure storage area. new text end new text begin (d) A cannabis flower packaging endorsement is available to the following license holders only if the license holder holds a cannabis retail operations endorsement: new text end new text begin (1) cannabis microbusinesses; new text end new text begin (2) cannabis mezzobusinesses; new text end new text begin (3) cannabis retailers; or new text end new text begin (4) medical cannabis combination businesses. new text end Sec. 22. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.28, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. new text begin Cannabis new text end cultivation endorsement. A cannabis microbusiness that cultivates cannabis plants and harvests cannabis flower mustnew text begin apply for and obtain a cannabis cultivation endorsement andnew text end comply with the requirements in section 342.25. Sec. 23. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.28, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. new text begin Cannabis new text end extraction and concentration endorsementnew text begin , hemp extraction and concentration endorsement, and creation of artificially derived cannabinoids endorsementnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end A cannabis microbusiness deleted text begin that createsdeleted text end new text begin seeking to manufacturenew text end cannabis concentrate mustnew text begin apply for and obtain a cannabis extraction and concentration endorsement andnew text end comply with the requirements in section 342.26, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text begin (b) A cannabis microbusiness seeking to manufacture hemp concentrate must apply for and obtain a hemp extraction and concentration endorsement and comply with the requirements in section 342.26, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end new text begin (c) A cannabis microbusiness seeking to manufacture artificially derived cannabinoids must apply for and obtain a creation of artificially derived cannabinoids endorsement and comply with the requirements in section 342.26, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end Sec. 24. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.28, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Production of consumer products endorsementnew text begin and edible cannabinoid product handler endorsementnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end A cannabis microbusiness deleted text begin that manufactures edibledeleted text end new text begin seeking to manufacturenew text end cannabis productsdeleted text begin , lower-potency hemp products,deleted text end or hemp-derived consumer products mustnew text begin apply for and obtain a production of consumer products endorsement andnew text end comply with the requirements in section 342.26, subdivisions 2 and 4. new text begin (b) A cannabis microbusiness seeking to manufacture edible cannabis products or lower-potency hemp edibles must apply for and obtain an edible cannabinoid product handler endorsement and comply with the requirements in section 342.26, subdivisions 2 and 4. new text end Sec. 25. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.28, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Retail operations endorsement. new text begin (a) new text end A cannabis microbusiness deleted text begin that operatesdeleted text end new text begin seeking to operatenew text end a retail location mustnew text begin apply for and obtain a cannabis retail operations endorsement andnew text end comply with the requirements in section 342.27. new text begin (b) A cannabis microbusiness with a cannabis retail operations endorsement may apply for and obtain a cannabis flower packaging endorsement subject to the requirements in section 342.27, subdivision 2a. new text end Sec. 26. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.28, subdivision 11, is amended to read: Subd. 11. Transportation between facilities. A cannabis microbusiness deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin seeking tonew text end transport immature cannabis plants and seedlings, cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, hemp plant parts, hemp concentrate, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products between facilities operated by the cannabis microbusiness deleted text begin ifdeleted text end new text begin must apply for and obtain an internal transporter endorsement. To obtain an internal transporter endorsement,new text end the cannabis microbusinessnew text begin mustnew text end : (1) deleted text begin providesdeleted text end new text begin providenew text end the office with the information described in section 342.35, subdivision 2; and (2) deleted text begin compliesdeleted text end new text begin complynew text end with the requirements of section 342.36. Sec. 27. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.29, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. new text begin Cannabis new text end cultivation endorsement. A cannabis mezzobusiness deleted text begin that cultivatesdeleted text end new text begin seeking to cultivate new text end cannabis plants and deleted text begin harvestsdeleted text end new text begin harvest new text end cannabis flower mustnew text begin apply for and obtain a cannabis cultivation endorsement andnew text end comply with the requirements in section 342.25. Sec. 28. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.29, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. new text begin Cannabis new text end extraction and concentration endorsementnew text begin , hemp extraction and concentration endorsement, and creation of artificially derived cannabinoids endorsementnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end A cannabis mezzobusiness deleted text begin that createsdeleted text end new text begin seeking to manufacturenew text end cannabis concentrate mustnew text begin apply for and obtain a cannabis extraction and concentration endorsement andnew text end comply with the requirements in section 342.26, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text begin (b) A cannabis mezzobusiness seeking to manufacture hemp concentrate must apply for and obtain a hemp extraction and concentration endorsement and comply with the requirements in section 342.26, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end new text begin (c) A cannabis mezzobusiness seeking to manufacture artificially derived cannabinoids must apply for and obtain a creation of artificially derived cannabinoids endorsement and comply with the requirements in section 342.26, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end Sec. 29. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.29, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Production of consumer products endorsementnew text begin and edible cannabinoid product handler endorsementnew text end . new text begin (a) new text end A cannabis mezzobusiness deleted text begin that manufactures edibledeleted text end new text begin seeking to manufacturenew text end cannabis productsdeleted text begin , lower-potency hemp products,deleted text end or hemp-derived consumer products mustnew text begin apply for and obtain a production of consumer products endorsement andnew text end comply with the requirements in section 342.26, subdivisions 2 and 4. new text begin (b) A cannabis mezzobusiness seeking to manufacture edible cannabis products or lower-potency hemp edibles must apply for and obtain an edible cannabinoid product handler endorsement and comply with the requirements in section 342.26, subdivisions 2 and 4. new text end Sec. 30. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.29, subdivision 8, is amended to read: Subd. 8. Retail operations endorsement. new text begin (a) new text end A cannabis mezzobusiness deleted text begin that operatesdeleted text end new text begin seeking to operatenew text end a retail location mustnew text begin apply for and obtain a cannabis retail operations endorsement andnew text end comply with the requirements in section 342.27. new text begin (b) A cannabis mezzobusiness with a cannabis retail operations endorsement may apply for and obtain a cannabis flower packaging endorsement subject to the requirements in section 342.27, subdivision 2a. new text end Sec. 31. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.29, subdivision 8a, is amended to read: Subd. 8a. Multiple endorsements required. new text begin (a) new text end Within 18 months of receiving a cannabis mezzobusiness license, a cannabis mezzobusiness must new text begin apply for and new text end obtain at least two of thenew text begin followingnew text end endorsements deleted text begin identified in subdivisions 5, 6, 7, and 8.deleted text end new text begin :new text end new text begin (1) a cannabis cultivation endorsement under section 342.25; new text end new text begin (2) a cannabis extraction and concentration endorsement under section 342.26; new text end new text begin (3) a hemp extraction and concentration endorsement under section 342.26; new text end new text begin (4) a creation of artificially derived cannabinoids endorsement under section 342.26; new text end new text begin (5) an edible cannabinoid product handler endorsement under section 342.26; new text end new text begin (6) a production of consumer products endorsement under section 342.26; or new text end new text begin (7) a cannabis retail operations endorsement under section 342.27. new text end new text begin (b)new text end If a cannabis mezzobusiness fails to obtain multiple endorsements within 18 months, the office may suspend, revoke, or not renew the license as provided in section 342.21. Sec. 32. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.29, subdivision 10, is amended to read: Subd. 10. Transportation between facilities. A cannabis mezzobusiness deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin seeking tonew text end transport immature cannabis plants and seedlings, cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, hemp plant parts, hemp concentrate, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products between facilities operated by the cannabis mezzobusiness deleted text begin ifdeleted text end new text begin must apply for and obtain an internal transporter endorsement. To obtain an internal transporter endorsement,new text end the cannabis mezzobusinessnew text begin mustnew text end : (1) deleted text begin providesdeleted text end new text begin providenew text end the office with the information described in section 342.35, subdivision 2; and (2) deleted text begin compliesdeleted text end new text begin complynew text end with the requirements of section 342.36. Sec. 33. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.30, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authorized actions. new text begin (a) A cannabis cultivator seeking to cultivate cannabis must apply for and obtain a cannabis cultivation endorsement. new text end new text begin (b) new text end A cannabis cultivator deleted text begin license entitles the license holder todeleted text end new text begin with a cannabis cultivation endorsement maynew text end : (1) grow cannabis plants within the approved amount of space from seed or immature plant to mature plant; (2) harvest cannabis flower from a mature plant; (3) package and label immature cannabis plants and seedlings and cannabis flower for sale to other cannabis businesses; (4) sell immature cannabis plants and seedlings and cannabis flower to other cannabis businesses; (5) transport cannabis flower to a cannabis manufacturer located on the same premises; and (6) perform other actions approved by the office. Sec. 34. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.30, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Additional information required. In addition to the information required to be submitted under section 342.14, subdivision 1, and rules adopted pursuant to that section, a person, cooperative, or business seeking a cannabis deleted text begin cultivator licensedeleted text end new text begin cultivation endorsementnew text end must submit the following information in a form approved by the office: (1) an operating plan demonstrating the proposed size and layout of the cultivation facility; plans for wastewater and waste disposal for the cultivation facility; plans for providing electricity, water, and other utilities necessary for the normal operation of the cultivation facility; and plans for compliance with the applicable building code and federal and state environmental and workplace safety requirements; (2) a cultivation plan demonstrating the proposed size and layout of the cultivation facility that will be used exclusively for cultivation including the total amount of plant canopy; and (3) evidence that the business will comply with the applicable operation requirements for the license being sought. Sec. 35. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.31, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Additional information required. In addition to the information required to be submitted under section 342.14, subdivision 1, and rules adopted pursuant to that section, a person, cooperative, or business seeking a cannabis deleted text begin manufacturer licensedeleted text end new text begin extraction and concentration endorsement, a hemp extraction and concentration endorsement, a creation of artificially derived cannabinoids endorsement, a production of consumer products endorsement, or an edible product handler endorsementnew text end must submit the following information in a form approved by the office: (1) an operating plan demonstrating the proposed layout of the facility, including a diagram of ventilation and filtration systems; plans for wastewater and waste disposal for the manufacturing facility; plans for providing electricity, water, and other utilities necessary for the normal operation of the manufacturing facility; and plans for compliance with applicable building code and federal and state environmental and workplace safety requirements; and (2) evidence that the business will comply with the applicable operation requirements for the endorsement being sought. Sec. 36. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.31, subdivision 5, is amended to read: Subd. 5. Manufacturing operations. A cannabis manufacturer must comply with the requirements in section 342.26.new text begin A cannabis manufacturer must apply for and obtain a cannabis extraction and concentration endorsement, a hemp extraction and concentration endorsement, a creation of artificially derived cannabinoids endorsement, a production of consumer products endorsement, or an edible product handler endorsement before conducting activities authorized only under the applicable endorsement.new text end Sec. 37. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.32, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authorized actions. new text begin (a) A cannabis retailer seeking to conduct retail sales of cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, or hemp-derived consumer products must apply for and obtain a cannabis retail operations endorsement. new text end new text begin (b) new text end A cannabis retailer deleted text begin license entitles the license holder todeleted text end new text begin with a cannabis retail operations endorsement maynew text end : (1) purchase immature cannabis plants and seedlings, cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products from cannabis microbusinesses, cannabis mezzobusinesses, cannabis cultivators, cannabis manufacturers, cannabis wholesalers, and medical cannabis combination businesses; (2) purchase lower-potency hemp edibles from a licensed lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer or lower-potency hemp edible wholesaler; (3) sell immature cannabis plants and seedlings, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, hemp-derived consumer products, and other products authorized by law to customers; and (4) perform other actions approved by the office. Sec. 38. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.32, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Additional information required. In addition to the information required to be submitted under section 342.14, subdivision 1, and rules adopted pursuant to that section, a person, cooperative, or business seeking a cannabis retail deleted text begin licensedeleted text end new text begin operations endorsementnew text end must submit the following information in a form approved by the office: (1) a list of every retail license held by the applicant and, if the applicant is a business, every retail license held, either as an individual or as part of another business, by each officer, director, manager, and general partner of the cannabis business; (2) an operating plan demonstrating the proposed layout of the facility, including a diagram of ventilation and filtration systems; policies to avoid sales to individuals who are under 21 years of age; identification of a restricted area for storage; and plans to prevent the visibility of cannabis flower, cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products to individuals outside the retail location; and (3) evidence that the business will comply with the applicable operation requirements for the license being sought. Sec. 39. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.44, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Application; contents. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, the provisions of this chapter relating to license applications, license selection criteria, general ownership disqualifications and requirements, and general operational requirements do not apply to hemp businesses. (b) The office shall establish forms and procedures for the processing of hemp licenses issued under this chapter. At a minimum, any application to obtain or renew a hemp license shall include the following information, if applicable: (1) the name, address, and date of birth of the applicant; (2) the address and legal property description of the business; (3) proof of trade name registration; (4) certification that the applicant will comply with the requirements of this chapter relating to the ownership and operation of a hemp business; (5) identification of one or more controlling persons or managerial employees as agents who shall be responsible for dealing with the office on all matters; and (6) a statement that the applicant agrees to respond to the office's supplemental requests for information. (c) An applicant for a lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer license must submit an attestation signed by a bona fide labor organization stating that the applicant has entered into a labor peace agreement. A labor peace agreement entered into on or after August 15, 2025, must address the duration of the election. new text begin (d) The office may determine whether any civil or regulatory violation as determined by the office, another state agency, a local government, or any other jurisdiction disqualifies an individual or business from receiving a hemp business license issued under this chapter. The office may determine the length of the disqualification. new text end Sec. 40. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.45, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Extraction and concentration. (a) A lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer deleted text begin that createsdeleted text end new text begin seeking to createnew text end hemp concentrate deleted text begin ordeleted text end new text begin must apply for and obtain a lower-potency hemp extraction and concentration endorsement. A lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer seeking to createnew text end artificially derived cannabinoids must new text begin apply for and new text end obtain deleted text begin andeleted text end new text begin a lower-potency hemp creation of artificially derived cannabinoidnew text end endorsement from the office. (b) A lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer deleted text begin seeking andeleted text end new text begin with a lower-potency hemp extraction and concentrationnew text end endorsement deleted text begin to create hemp concentratedeleted text end must inform the office of all methods of extraction and concentration that the manufacturer intends to use and identify the volatile chemicals, if any, that will be involved in the creation of hemp concentrate. A lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer may not use a method of extraction and concentration or a volatile chemical without approval by the office. (c) A lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer deleted text begin seeking andeleted text end new text begin with a lower-potency hemp creation of artificially derived cannabinoidnew text end endorsement deleted text begin to create artificially derived cannabinoidsdeleted text end must inform the office of all methods of conversion that the manufacturer will use, including any specific catalysts that the manufacturer will employ, to create artificially derived cannabinoids and the molecular nomenclature of all cannabinoids or other chemical compounds that the manufacturer will create. A deleted text begin business licensed or authorized to manufacture lower-potency hemp ediblesdeleted text end new text begin lower-potency hemp edible manufacturernew text end may not use a method of conversion or a catalyst without approval by the office. (d) A lower-potency hemp edible manufacturernew text begin with a lower-potency hemp extraction and concentration endorsement or a lower-potency hemp creation of artificially derived cannabinoid endorsementnew text end must obtain a certification from an independent third-party industrial hygienist or professional engineer approving: (1) all electrical, gas, fire suppression, and exhaust systems; and (2) the plan for safe storage and disposal of hazardous substances, including but not limited to any volatile chemicals. (e) Upon the sale of hemp concentrate or artificially derived cannabinoids to any person, cooperative, or business, a lower-potency hemp edible manufacturer must provide a statement to the buyer that discloses the method of extraction and concentration or conversion used and any solvents, gases, or catalysts, including but not limited to any volatile chemicals involved in that method. Sec. 41. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.515, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Authorized actions. (a) A person, cooperative, or business holding a medical cannabis combination business license is prohibited from owning or operating any other cannabis business or hemp business or holding an active registration agreement under new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, new text end section 152.25, subdivision 1. (b) A person or business may hold only one medical cannabis combination business license. (c) A medical cannabis combination business licensenew text begin , consistent with the specific license endorsements,new text end entitles the license holder to perform any or all of the following within the limits established by this section: (1) grow cannabis plants from seed or immature plant to mature plant and harvest adult-use cannabis flower and medical cannabis flower from a mature plant; (2) make cannabis concentrate; (3) make hemp concentrate, including hemp concentrate with a delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of more than 0.3 percent as measured by weight; (4) manufacture artificially derived cannabinoids; (5) manufacture medical cannabinoid products; (6) manufacture adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products for public consumption; (7) purchase immature cannabis plants and seedlings and cannabis flower from a cannabis microbusiness, a cannabis mezzobusiness, a cannabis manufacturer, a cannabis wholesaler, or another medical cannabis combination business; (8) purchase hemp plant parts and propagules from an industrial hemp grower licensed under chapter 18K; (9) purchase cannabis concentrate, hemp concentrate, and artificially derived cannabinoids from a cannabis microbusiness, a cannabis mezzobusiness, a cannabis manufacturer, a cannabis wholesaler, or another medical cannabis combination business; (10) purchase hemp concentrate from an industrial hemp processor licensed under chapter 18K; (11) manufacture, package, and label medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products for sale to cannabis businesses with a medical cannabis processor endorsement, cannabis businesses with a medical cannabis retail endorsement, other medical cannabis combination businesses, and persons in the registry program; (12) transport and deliver medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products to medical cannabis processors, medical cannabis retailers, other medical cannabis combination businesses, patients enrolled in the registry program, registered designated caregivers, and parents, legal guardians, and spouses of an enrolled patient; (13) manufacture, package, and label adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products for sale to customers and other cannabis businesses; (14) sell medical cannabis flower and medical cannabinoid products to other cannabis businesses with a medical endorsement, other medical cannabis combination businesses, and patients enrolled in the registry program, registered designated caregivers, and parents, legal guardians, and spouses of an enrolled patient; (15) sell immature cannabis plants and seedlings, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, hemp-derived consumer products, and other products authorized by law to other cannabis businesses and to customers; (16) transport immature cannabis plants and seedlings, adult-use cannabis flower, adult-use cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, hemp-derived consumer products, and other products authorized by law to other cannabis businesses; (17) sell and transport lower-potency hemp edibles to lower-potency hemp edible retailers and lower-potency hemp edible wholesalers; and (18) perform other actions approved by the office. deleted text begin (d) A medical cannabis combination business is not required to obtain a medical cannabis endorsement to perform any actions authorized under this section. deleted text end Sec. 42. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.515, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Cultivation; size limitations. (a) A medical cannabis combination businessnew text begin with a cannabis cultivation endorsementnew text end may cultivate cannabis to be sold as medical cannabis flower or used in medical cannabinoid products in an area of up to 60,000 square feet of plant canopy subject to the limits on adult-use cannabis cultivation in paragraph (c). A medical cannabis combination business may cultivate cannabis and manufacture cannabis in more than one location, except the aggregate total of plant canopy in all locations must count toward the business' canopy limit. (b) A medical cannabis combination business may cultivate cannabis to be sold as adult-use cannabis flower or used in adult-use cannabis products in an area authorized by the office as described in paragraph (c). (c) The office shall authorize a medical cannabis combination business to cultivate cannabis for sale in the adult-use market in an area of plant canopy that is equal to one-half of the area the business used to cultivate cannabis sold in the medical market in the preceding year. The office shall establish an annual verification and authorization procedure. The office may increase the area of plant canopy in which a medical cannabis combination business is authorized to cultivate cannabis for sale in the adult-use market between authorization periods if the business demonstrates a significant increase in the sale of medical cannabis and medical cannabis products. Sec. 43. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.515, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Retail locations. A medical cannabis combination businessnew text begin with a cannabis retail operations endorsementnew text end may operate up to one retail location in each congressional district. A medical cannabis combination business must offer medical cannabis flower, medical cannabinoid products, or both at every retail location. Sec. 44. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 342.515, subdivision 6, is amended to read: Subd. 6. Operations. A medical cannabis combination business deleted text begin must comply with the relevant requirements ofdeleted text end new text begin may apply for and obtain any endorsement identified in new text end sections 342.25, 342.26, 342.27, and 342.51deleted text begin , subdivisions 2 to 5deleted text end . Sec. 45. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.515, subdivision 7, is amended to read: Subd. 7. Transportation. new text begin (a) new text end A medical cannabis combination business deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin seeking to:new text end new text begin (1)new text end transport immature cannabis plants and seedlings, cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, hemp plant parts, hemp concentrate, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products deleted text begin if thedeleted text end new text begin between facilities operated by the business must apply for and obtain an internal transporter endorsement; or new text end new text begin (2) transport immature cannabis plants and seedlings, cannabis flower, cannabis products, artificially derived cannabinoids, hemp plant parts, hemp concentrate, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products to other cannabis and hemp businesses must apply for and obtain an external transporter endorsement. new text end new text begin (b) Anew text end medical cannabis combination businessnew text begin seeking an endorsement under paragraph (a) mustnew text end : (1) deleted text begin providesdeleted text end new text begin providenew text end the office with the information described in section 342.35, subdivision 2; and (2) deleted text begin compliesdeleted text end new text begin complynew text end with the requirements of section 342.36. Sec. 46. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 342.62, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Packaging requirements. (a) deleted text begin Except as provided in paragraph (b),deleted text end All deleted text begin cannabis flower,deleted text end cannabis products, lower-potency hemp edibles, and hemp-derived consumer products sold to customers or patients must bedeleted text begin :deleted text end deleted text begin (1)deleted text end prepackaged in packaging or a container that is child-resistant, tamper-evident, and opaquedeleted text begin ; ordeleted text end new text begin .new text end deleted text begin (2) placed in packaging or a container that is plain, child-resistant, tamper-evident, and opaque at the final point of sale to a customer. deleted text end new text begin (b) All cannabis flower sold to customers or patients must be prepackaged unless the business selling the cannabis flower holds a cannabis flower packaging endorsement. new text end deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (c)new text end The requirement that packaging be child-resistant does not apply to a lower-potency hemp edible that is intended to be consumed as a beverage. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end If a cannabis product, lower-potency hemp edible, or a hemp-derived consumer product is packaged in a manner that includes more than a single serving, each serving must be indicated by scoring, wrapping, or other indicators designating the individual serving size. deleted text begin (d)deleted text end new text begin (e)new text end Notwithstanding paragraph deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end , any edible cannabinoid products that are intended to be combined with food or beverage products before consumption must indicate a single serving using one of the following methods: (1) the product is packaged in individual servings; (2) the product indicates a single serving by scoring or use of another indicator that appears on the product; or (3) the product is sold with a calibrated dropper, measuring spoon, or similar device for measuring a single serving. deleted text begin (e)deleted text end new text begin (f)new text end A package containing multiple servings of a lower-potency hemp edible that is not intended to be consumed as a beverage must not contain: (1) more than 50 milligrams of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol; (2) more than 1,000 milligrams of cannabidiol, cannabigerol, cannabinol, or cannabichromenedeleted text begin :deleted text end new text begin ;new text end (3) more than the established limit of any other cannabinoid authorized by the office; or (4) any combination of those cannabinoids that exceeds the identified amounts for the applicable product category. deleted text begin (f)deleted text end new text begin (g)new text end A single container containing a lower-potency hemp edible deleted text begin productdeleted text end that is intended to be consumed as a beverage must not contain: (1) more than ten milligrams of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol; (2) more than 200 milligrams of cannabidiol, cannabigerol, cannabinol, or cannabichromene; (3) more than the established limit of any other cannabinoid authorized by the office; or (4) any combination of those cannabinoids that exceeds the identified amounts for the applicable product category. deleted text begin (g)deleted text end new text begin (h)new text end Edible cannabis products and lower-potency hemp edibles containing more than a single serving must be prepackaged deleted text begin or placed at the final point of saledeleted text end in packaging or a container that is resealable.